assets/combined_patterns.pat
1-
1a2dä
1ä2gä
1ä2gy
1a2kad
1a2nesthési
1ä2q
1a2rea
1a4von
1abd
1abf
1abg
1abh
1abk
1abn
1abs
1abw
1abz
1ac1c
1adg
1adj
1adju
1adm
1adv
1ae2q
1afri
1akko
1akz
1alcool
1an1sv
1anb
1anf
1anh
1anl
1anr
1anw
1appa
1ar1c
1arb
1arra
1aug
1äug
1auk7s6
1äuß
1auto
1avd
1avfa
1avg
1avt
1avvi
1äx
1b
1b1
1b2l
1b2lad
1b2r
1b2u
1b4a
1b4å
1b4i
1b4ø
1b4ra
1ba
1bá
1bâ
1bã
1bat
1be
1bé
1bè
1bê
1bě.
1bel
1bi
1bí
1bî
1bil
1bj
1bl
1blok
1bo
1bó
1bô
1bõ
1boen
1bomb
1bot
1br
1br4
1bry
1bu
1bú
1bû
1bv
1by
1c
1ç
1c1
1ç1
1c2h
1c2k
1c2l
1c2r
1c2u
1c2v
1c4a
1c4l
1c4l4
1c4r2
1ca
1cá
1câ
1cã
1ča
1čá
1ça
1çá
1çâ
1çã
1ce
1cé
1cè
1cê
1če
1çe
1çé
1çê
1ced
1ceh
1cel
1cen
1cer
1cha
1chá
1châ
1chau
1ché
1chef
1chu
1chy
1ci
1cí
1cî
1či
1čí
1çi
1çí
1ci3t
1cj
1čj
1cl
1ćl
1čl
1clo
1clu
1co
1có
1cô
1cõ
1čo
1ço
1çó
1çõ
1co4c
1cœ
1cr
1ćr
1čr
1cra
1cru
1cu
1cú
1cû
1ců
1ču
1čů
1çu
1çú
1cus
1cv
1ćv
1čv
1cy
1d
1d'
1d1
1d2a
1d2l
1d2r
1d2riv
1d4i3a
1d6rag
1da
1dá
1dâ
1dã
1ďa
1dåd
1dæ
1dåp
1de
1dé
1dè
1dê
1dě
1den
1di
1dí
1dî
1di1v
1dina
1dio
1dj
1đj
1đl
1dln
1dmd
1do
1dó
1dô
1dõ
1dø
1ďo
1dr
1đr
1dr4
1dram
1du
1dú
1dû
1dů
1dv
1đv
1dy
1dý
1džj
1džl
1džr
1džv
1é2drie
1é2drique
1é2lectr
1é2lément
1é2nerg
1e2tat
1eff
1ekd
1eksp
1ekz
1endr
1eu1o
1eua4
1euc
1exp
1f
1f1
1f2l
1f2r
1fa
1fá
1fâ
1fä
1fã
1fe
1fé
1fè
1fê
1fér
1fi
1fí
1fî
1fj
1fl
1flå
1flo
1fo
1fó
1fô
1fö
1fõ
1fø
1fr
1fra
1fu
1fú
1fû
1fü
1fv
1fy
1g
1g1
1ğ1
1g2ha
1g2he
1g2hi
1g2ho
1g2hy
1g2l
1g2las
1g2lid
1g2n
1g2r
1g4lor
1ga
1gá
1gâ
1gå
1gã
1ge
1gé
1gè
1gê
1gen
1geo
1gi
1gí
1gî
1gi4a
1gj
1gl
1gla4s
1gle
1go
1gó
1gô
1gõ
1gr
1gr4
1gu
1gú
1gû
1gu4a
1gu4e
1gu4i
1gu4o
1gv
1gy
1h
1h1
1ha
1hâ
1he
1hé
1hè
1hê
1head
1hi
1hî
1hj
1hl
1ho
1hô
1höh
1hous
1hr
1hu
1hû
1hv
1hy
1hyd
1hyg
1hyp
1ï
1i2dio
1i2js
1i4dol
1idy
1illu
1impo
1impu
1indu
1inf
1informat
1inng
1innt
1inri
1insp
1int4r
1inv
1isol
1j
1j1
1j4on
1j4u
1ja
1já
1jâ
1jã
1jaar
1jae
1jag
1jar
1jas3
1jaz
1je
1jé
1jê
1ji
1jí
1jo
1jó
1jõ
1jø.
1jøa.
1job
1jøe
1jou
1jour
1ju
1jú
1jub
1jung
1jus
1k
1k1
1k2h
1k2l
1k2l4
1k2lim2
1k2lj
1k2n4
1k2no
1k2r
1k2ris
1k4raf
1k4vel
1k6øyr
1ka
1ka.
1ká
1kâ
1kä
1kã
1ka7t6a
1kam
1kana
1kane
1kant
1kapp
1kar.
1kara
1karb
1karf
1karm
1kart
1kas
1ke
1ké
1kè
1kê
1ké4
1kee
1ki
1kí
1kî
1king
1kir
1kj
1kjøp
1klip
1klos
1kn2
1ko
1kó
1kô
1kö
1kõ
1kø.
1ko1o
1køe
1kom
1kon
1kor3r
1kos
1kov4s3
1kr
1kr2
1kr4
1kra
1krav
1krim
1ku
1kú
1kû
1kü
1kult
1kun
1kup
1kurs
1kurv
1kus
1kuu8
1kvo
1ky
1ky4st
1kyr
1l
1l1
1l2h
1l4ine
1l8ar.
1la
1la.
1lá
1lá.
1là
1lâ
1lã
1la2ß1
1laa
1labo
1lae
1læ1
1lah
1lai
1laj
1lat
1law
1lax
1le
1le.
1lé
1lé.
1lè
1lê
1lej
1lel
1lent
1ler
1lér
1les
1li
1lí
1lî
1lík
1líř
1ljl
1ljr
1ljv
1lo
1ló
1lô
1lö
1lõ
1lø
1log
1los
1lov
1lu
1lu.
1lú
1lû
1lů
1luf
1luj
1lun
1lus.
1lut
1luv
1ly
1lý
1m
1m1
1m2némo
1m2nès
1m2nési
1ma
1má
1mâ
1må
1mä
1mã
1mæ
1me
1mé
1mè
1mê
1men
1mi
1mí
1mî
1mj
1mjø
1ml
1mo
1mó
1mô
1mö
1mõ
1mø
1mœ
1mr
1mu
1mú
1mû
1müd
1müh
1mul
1mül
1mün
1müt
1mv
1my
1n
1ň
1ñ
1n1
1n2ah
1n2ai
1n2h
1n2i
1n2us
1na
1na.
1ná
1nâ
1nä
1nã
1na1o
1naa
1nåd
1næ1
1nag
1nal
1nål
1naö
1nat
1nav
1naw
1ne
1né
1nè
1nê
1nen
1nes
1ni
1ní
1nî
1njj
1njl
1njr
1njv
1nl
1no
1nó
1nô
1nõ
1nø
1no3d
1noc
1nœ
1nogr
1nolo
1nom
1norm
1nos
1not
1nou
1nu
1nú
1nû
1nü.
1nu1a
1nü1e
1nu2ß1
1nu2x1
1nüa
1nuc
1nüc
1nud
1nug
1nui
1nük
1nüm
1nün2
1nuo
1nüo
1nus
1nüs
1nüß
1nut
1nüt
1nuu
1nüv
1nüw
1nuz
1nüz
1nv
1ny
1ny.
1nyf
1nyh
1nyl
1nyr
1nys
1nyw
1o1gis
1ö2ko
1ö2le
1ö2lu
1o4bli
1ob1j
1octet
1ödu
1oefe
1ogig
1ogy
1øko
1okw
1öl.
1öl1a2
1öli
1ölm
1ölr
1öls2
1ölv
1ölw
1ombu
1ømfi
1omn
1omr
1ont3w
1ony
1op1t2
1opn
1oppg
1or3g4a
1ordn
1osm
1oxy
1p
1p1
1p2h
1p2l
1p2l2
1p2né
1p2neu
1p2r
1p2ro
1p2rod
1p2sy
1p2sych
1p2tér
1p2tèr
1p2u
1p2y
1p4eil
1p4las
1p4or
1pa
1pá
1pâ
1pä
1pã
1pa4s3
1pæ
1pag
1pål
1pap
1pås
1path
1påv
1pe
1pé
1pè
1pê
1ped
1per
1peri
1ph
1phy
1pi
1pí
1pî
1pia
1pig
1pil
1pip
1pis
1pit
1pj
1pl
1pl2
1pla
1po
1pó
1pô
1pö
1põ
1pol
1pom
1pos
1pr
1prem
1pres
1prij
1pris
1pro
1proc
1proj
1pty
1pu
1pú
1pû
1püf
1pv
1py
1py1
1q
1qu4a
1qu4e
1qu4i
1qu4o
1que
1r
1r1
1r2äd
1r2h
1r2ig
1r2je
1r2uf
1r4ar.
1ra
1ra.
1rá
1râ
1rã
1raj
1rák
1rář
1raü
1re
1re.
1ré
1rè
1rê
1reac
1reg
1regi
1rel
1repu
1rer
1res.
1resm
1resu
1revy
1ri
1rí
1rî
1ri2ß1
1ric
1rifl
1ro
1ro.
1ró
1rô
1rõ
1řo
1robe
1roc
1röh
1roi
1roï
1room
1rør
1ru
1ru.
1rú
1rû
1ry
1ry.
1rytm
1ryx
1s
1š
1s1
1ş1
1s2
1s2a5ne
1s2äb
1s2am
1s2ar.
1s2ät
1s2caph
1s2ch
1ś2ci
1s2clér
1s2cop
1s2h
1s2krå
1s2lav
1s2lov
1s2mør
1s2my4k
1s2nør
1s2omt
1s2on
1s2oz
1s2patia
1s2pei
1s2perm
1s2phér
1s2phèr
1s2piel
1s2piros
1s2por
1s2tandard
1s2tein
1s2tigm
1s2tip
1s2tock
1s2tomos
1s2trø
1s2troph
1s2tructu
1s2tub
1s2tyle
1s2vø
1s4al.
1s4kue
1s4lui
1s4lyn
1s4nij
1s4pie
1s4tr
1sa
1sa.
1sá
1sâ
1sã
1sa3le
1saa
1saag
1sab
1sac
1sæ
1saf
1safe
1sakh
1saki
1sal
1salg
1sam
1sara
1sas
1sat
1säu
1saur
1sax
1sb
1šb
1sc
1sć
1sč
1sce
1sd
1sđ
1šd
1šđ
1sdž
1šdž
1se
1sé
1sè
1sê
1sf
1šf
1sg
1šg
1sh
1šh
1si
1sí
1sî
1sig
1sio
1sis
1siv
1sj
1šj
1sjer
1sk
1šk
1ska
1skå
1skab
1ske
1ski
1skol
1skuf
1sky
1slåt
1slj
1slu
1sm
1šm
1snj
1so
1so.
1só
1sô
1sõ
1sø
1so1re
1so7li
1soa
1soc
1sod
1soe
1sœ
1sog
1soi
1sol
1sold
1som
1som5m
1sor.
1sos
1sos2
1sov
1sow
1šp
1spi
1spru
1spü
1sr
1šr
1ss
1sš
1šs
1šš
1ße
1ßi
1ßu2
1st
1št
1stå
1stan
1stas
1stat
1stav
1ste.
1sted
1sten
1stø
1stof
1str
1stu
1sty
1styl
1su
1sú
1sû
1sů
1su2b
1su2b1
1sü2d1
1su4a
1süc
1sue
1süf
1sui
1suk5s
1sul
1sup
1surf
1sus
1süs2
1süß
1sv
1šv
1sy
1sy1s
1sys5
1sz
1sž
1šz
1šž
1t
1ť
1t1
1t2ag
1t2h
1t2her
1t2l
1t2od
1t2ou
1t2r
1t4ar.
1ta
1ta.
1tá
1tà
1tâ
1tã
1tæ
1taen
1täf
1tag
1täg
1tage
1taj
1tak.
1tal.
1talg
1tane
1tank
1tape
1tau
1tax
1te
1té
1tè
1tê
1tě
1tee
1tent
1teo
1teri
1tex1
1the
1tho
1thr
1ti
1tí
1tî
1tia
1tíc
1tim
1tím
1tio
1tiv
1tiz
1tj
1tj2
1tjen
1tl
1to
1tó
1tô
1tõ
1to3ke
1to4l3k
1toch
1toe
1töl
1ton
1tön
1too
1töt
1tr
1tra
1try
1tu
1tu.
1tú
1tû
1tů
1tüf
1tuj
1tule
1tus.
1tv
1ty
1ty.
1tý.
1ty1
1tyd
1tým
1tyn
1typ
1týř
1ú
1ü
1ü2b
1u2e2b
1u2nif
1uavh
1uit5r
1uitg
1uluk
1uly
1umf
1umg
1umk
1uml
1umr
1umz
1ungd
1univ
1unm
1unr
1unt
1unv
1unw
1upd
1urč
1ut1s4
1utb
1utd
1utf
1utg
1utny
1utø4v
1utv
1v
1v1
1v2
1v2je
1v2l
1v2r
1v4ann
1v8er.
1va
1vá
1vâ
1vã
1våa
1våe
1væ
1værk
1vakt
1vån
1ve
1ve.
1vé
1vè
1vê
1ved
1vei1e
1vekt
1ven
1vet.
1vets
1vi
1ví
1vî
1via
1vid
1vilj
1vir
1vis
1vo
1vó
1vô
1võ
1vok
1vol
1vos
1vr
1vu
1vú
1vû
1vy
1w
1w2l
1w2r
1wa
1wat
1wate
1we
1wi
1wo
1wo2
1wu
1x
1x2a1e2
1x2ac
1x2ad
1x2ag2
1x2as
1xa
1xa.
1xá
1xâ
1xã
1xe
1xé
1xê
1xi
1xí
1xim
1xip
1xo
1xó
1xõ
1xu
1xú
1xy.
1y
1y1
1y2ac
1yac
1yak
1yog
1z
1ž
1z1
1za
1zá
1zâ
1zã
1zc
1zć
1zč
1žc
1žć
1žč
1zđ
1žd
1žđ
1zdž
1ždž
1ze
1zé
1zè
1zê
1zf
1žf
1žg
1zh
1žh
1zi
1zí
1zifi
1zis
1zj
1zk
1žk
1žl
1žm
1znj
1zo
1zó
1zõ
1zp
1žp
1žr
1zš
1žs
1žš
1zt
1žt
1zu
1zú
1zv
1žv
1zy
1zz
1zž
1žz
1žž
1акк
1аргу
1ассиг
1атак
1б2и
1б2лаз
1б2лее
1б2лея
1б2луж
1б2рал
1б2рач
1б2ред
1б2роди
1б2роси
1б2рю
1б2у
1ба
1бе
1бё
1благ
1бо
1брас
1бы
1бь
1бя
1в2з2
1в2риз
1в2э1
1в2ю
1ва
1вев
1вее
1веё
1вез
1вёз
1вей.
1вес
1вёс
1вец
1вею
1вея
1виз
1винт
1винч
1вме
1вмё
1вод
1вок
1вох
1вою
1врид
1врю
1ву1з
1вуа
1вхо
1вы
1вье
1вьё
1вьин
1вью
1вья
1вя
1г
1д2разн
1д2рож
1д2рыг
1д2ряг
1д2ю
1да
1дви
1дворь
1де
1дё
1ди
1до
1дравш
1дрема
1дрёма
1дремл
1дремы
1дрёмы
1друг
1друж
1ду
1ды
1дье
1дьё
1дью
1дья
1дя
1ж
1з2вон
1з2о3ре
1з2о3рё
1з2ю
1за1
1зву
1зе
1зё
1зи
1зов
1зое
1зои
1зой.
1зок.
1зол2
1зом.
1зон
1зоо
1зох
1зоэ
1зою
1зу
1зы
1зье
1зьи
1зью
1зя
1из1д
1инж
1инсп
1инсти
1инсу
1инф
1инъ
1ирр
1кав
1кае
1каё
1кай
1кал.
1кало
1калс
1кам
1кан
1кат
1ках
1каю
1ке
1кё
1кив
1кит
1клук
1клю
1ков
1код
1коз
1кольс
1кос
1котн
1кош
1криб
1куй
1куля
1кур
1кут
1куче
1куют
1кь
1л2гал
1ла.
1ла1х
1лае
1лам.
1лами.
1лая
1ле.
1лен
1лён
1лех
1лёх
1ли
1ло
1лу.
1луе
1луё
1лун
1лую
1лы.
1лые
1лыж
1лый
1лым
1лых.
1льсти
1льстя
1льща
1льще
1льщё
1льщу
1лю.
1люж
1люсь
1ля
1м
1н2ю
1на
1не
1нё
1ни
1но
1ну
1ны
1нье
1ньё
1ньи
1ньо
1нью
1нья
1ня
1о2деял
1обм
1объ
1окт
1олимп
1отг
1отд
1отх
1п
1р2вав
1ра.
1рабо
1равня
1ракиз
1ралг
1рамк
1рамн
1расл
1раста
1ращи
1раю
1рая
1рвет
1рвёт
1ре.
1ре1зо
1рё1зо
1резк
1рёзк
1рейш
1рекш
1рёкш
1ренк
1рёнк
1рень
1репь
1ринс
1риу
1риц
1риш
1ро.
1рогол
1рогру
1родь
1розар
1рокон
1рокр
1ролис
1ролиц
1ромор
1ронаж
1ронап
1ронос
1росл
1росш
1росю
1рот2в
1ротк
1роу
1рояз
1ру.
1руба
1ружей
1рул
1руха
1рухо
1ручн
1ры.
1рыб
1рым
1рье
1рьё
1рьи
1рью
1рья
1рю.
1рюс
1ряю
1с2в
1с2е
1с2ё
1с2ж
1с2и
1с2каф
1с2наб
1с2неж
1с2пец
1с2фе
1с2хе
1с2ю
1с4те.
1са
1сб2
1сд2
1слав
1слад
1смес
1со
1ср
1ста.
1стей
1стел
1стёл
1стен.
1стён.
1сти
1сто.
1стов
1стог
1стод
1стое
1сток
1стом
1стон
1стос
1стот
1стою
1стую
1сты
1стья
1стям
1стях
1су
1сча
1съ2
1сы
1сье
1сьё
1сью
1сья
1ся
1т2е
1т2ё
1таг
1тас
1тащ
1торг
1торж
1торс
1торш
1тощ
1требо
1требу
1триб
1труб
1туша
1тушо
1тушь
1тущ
1тяг
1тяж
1тяп
1у2быт
1убра
1утю
1учр
1ф
1х2в
1х2лор
1х2му
1ха
1хе
1хи
1хлеб
1хлёб
1хо
1хран
1хром
1ху.
1хун
1хус
1хуш
1ц
1ч2ла
1ч2ло
1ча
1че
1чё
1чи
1чм
1чу
1чье
1чьё
1чьи
1чью
1чья
1ш
1щ
1э
1ю
1ათას
1ბა
1ბე
1ბი
1ბო
1ბუ
1ბღ2
1გუ
1დნ
1ვუ
1იღბალმ
1იღბლის
1კ2ბ
1კე
1ლა
1ლუ
1მა
1მი
1ნი
1ნუ
1ოღლ
1ჟი
1ჟო
1რი
1რუ
1სა
1სე
1სი
1სო
1სუ
1ფა
1ფე
1ფი
1ფო
1ფუ
1ქა
1ქე
1ქი
1ქო
1ქუ
1ღატ
1შა
1შე
1ში
1შო
1შუ
1ძი
1ძუ
1ძღ2
1ჭა
1ჭე
1ჭი
1ჭო
1ჭუ
1ჰა
1ჰე
1ჰი
1ก4รร
1กั
1กา
1กิ
1กุ
1กู
1ขั
1ขา
่1ค
1คา
1คุ
1ฆา
1งา
1จั
1จา
1จิ
1ฉั
1ฉา
1ชั
1ชา
1ชีว
1ซั
1ซา
1ซ่า
1ซิ
1ญา
1ฐา
1ณา
1ณิ
1ณี
1ดั
1ดา
1ตั
1ตา
1ติก.
1ทรา
1ทรี
1ทั
1ทา
1ทู
1ธร
1ธา
์1น
1นั
1นา
1น้ำ
1นิ
1นุ
1นู
์1บ
1บดี.
1บั
1บา
1บุ
1บู
1ประ
1ปั
1ปา
์1พ
1พรร
1พั
1พา
1พิ
1ฟ้
1ฟั
1ฟา
1ฟิ
1ภั
1ภา
1ภู
1มงคล
1มั
1มา
1มิ
1มือ.
1ยั
1ยา
1ยุ
์1ร
1รัต
1ราช
1รู
1ลักษ
1วงศ
1วั
1วา
1วิ
1วุ
1ศั
1ศา2
1ศิ
1ศึ
1ษั
1ษา
1ษิ
1สั
1สา
1สิ
1สุ
1สู
้1ห
1หั
1ให
1ฬา
1อั
1อา
่1เ
้1เ
์1เ
่1แ
้1แ
์1แ
์1โ
2'2
2a.
2a1
2â1
2a1an
2a1che
2a1cl
2ä1e
2a1e2
2a1h2a
2ä1he
2a1j
2a1ke
2a1ki
2a1kj
2a1ko
2a1o
2a1ö2
2a1rä
2a1ri
2a1ry
2ä1te
2a1ve
2a1w
2a1ya
'2a2nesthési
2a2r
2a2r3or
2ä2uf
2a3bas
2a3bet
2a3co
2a3de.
2a3dec
2a3ka.
2a3la.
2a3log
2a3met
2a3rio
2a3riu
2ä3se
2a3ten
2a3zu
2ab2ö
2abäd
2abah
2abal
2aban
2abe.
2abec
2abes
2abod
2aboe
2abol
2abot
2abr
2abrö
2abs.
2absf
2abu
2aby
2ac.
2aca
2ach.
2ach3l
2ach3m
2ach3r
2ach3w
2achb
2achf
2achh
2achk
2acho
2achp
2achv
2acl
2acr
2acu
2ad.
2add
2aden
2adep
2adf
2adh
2adi
2adl
2admu
2adp
2adq
2ads
2ads2
2adt1
2adve
2ady
2ae.
2ae1e
2aehr
2aehs
2aeht
2aei
2aen.
2aene
2aeni
2aens
2aenz
2aer.
2aerd
2aers
2aerw
2aes4e
2aess
2aeum
2af2ro
2afa
2afä
2afe
2afi
2afl
2afo
2afra
2afu
2afü
2afy
2åg
2aga
2agel
2agl
2agt
2ah
2äh.
2äh2s
2ähm
2ähni
2äht
2äi
2ain
2ak.
2ak1l
2akä
2akae
2akam
2akan
2akar
2akb
2akc
2akd
2ake
2akf
2akh
2akl
2akm
2ako
2akp
2akra
2akre
2akri
2aks
2aktb
2aktg
2aktm
2aktw
2akul
2akun
2akur
2akv
2akw
2al.
2alai
2alat
'2alcool
2ale
2aleg
2ales.
2alg.
2alo.
2alos
2alp
2als
2aly
2am.
2amä
2äma
2amc
2amd
2ame.
2amf
2amg
2ami
2amk
2aml
2äml
2ams
2ämtl
2amtv
2amu
2amv
2amw
2än.
2anac
2anbo
2anbu
2anbü
2anc
2andj
2ane.
2äne
2anen
2aner
2anf.
2anfi
2anfs
2ang
2angb
2angv
2anhu
2anhü
2ani
2äni
2änk
2ankt
2anla
2ann.
2anns
2annt
2anø
2anog
2anrö
2äns
2ansu
2ant.
2anti
2ants
2anu
2anwi
2anzg
2anzh
2anzk
2anzm
2anzr
2anzs
2anzt
2ao
2ap.
2apf.
2äpfc
2apfs
2aph
2apl
2apol
2apt
2apu
2ar.
2ar2n
2arae
2aran
2arar
2arat
2arba
2arbi
2arbo
2arbø
2arbr
2arbs2
2arbt2
2arbu
2arby
2ärd
2are.
2äre
2arec
2areg2
2arem
2ares
2aret
2arg.
2ari.
2aria
2arin
2armö
2arn
2årn
2arö
2aroe
2arof
2arok
2arol
2arot
2arr.
2arrä
2arrs
2arrt
2ars
2arsa
2arsk
2arzi
2ase
2asf
2äss
2asy.
2at.
2at2i
2ata
2atb
2ate.
2atek
2atg
2atm
2atn
2åtn
2ats
2atu
2au1e
2au1i
2au1r
2au3a2
2äu3r
2aub
2auc
2augl
2auhr
2auj
2äul
2aum
2äum
2aun
2aup
2äus.
2auso
2auti
2auts3
2auu
2auw
2aux
2auz
2av
2avi
2avir
2avo
2avu
2avy
2aw
2ay
2az2w
2b'
2b.
2b1a2f
2b1äh
2b1am
2b1b
2b1c
2b1ć
2b1č
2b1d
2b1e2x1
2b1f
2b1f2
2b1g
2b1h
2b1k
2b1k2
2b1k4
2b1lj
2b1m
2b1n
2b1ń
2b1n2
2b1öf
2b1p
2b1p2
2b1s
2b1ś
2b1s2
2b1t
2b1v
2b1z
2b1ź
2b1ż
2b3a2br
2b3adl
2b3adm
2b3aeh
2b3ahl
2b3ans
2b3app
2b3ärz
2b3c2n
2b3c2t
2b3c2z
2b3edl
2b3eff
2b3emp
2b3f2t
2b3g2n
2b3if
2b3imb
2b3imp
2b3inb
2b3int
2b3inv
2b3irr
2b3lac
2b3läd
2b3lak
2b3län
2b3leh
2b3m2n
2b3p2n
2b3p2s
2b3p2t
2b3rad
2b3räd
2b3re.
2b3reg
2b3rep
2b3reu
2b3roh
2b3rol
2b3rou
2b3rüb
2b3t2s
2b3t2z
2b3u2fe
2b3umf
